__1st_try_roman_lexica__/part.lexc
!!!part.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +Part

LEXICON Root
Part;

LEXICON PartInf
+Part:0 #;

LEXICON Part
!Lexical items from corpus
ya	PartInf;
xwb	PartInf;
ke	PartInf;
dygr	PartInf;
āya	PartInf;
āxr	PartInf;
mgr	PartInf;
ra	PartInf;
